en: Toys & Games > Toys > Dolls, Playsets & Toy Figures > Action & Toy Figures: Action Figures; Animal Figures
cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Panenky, hrací sady a figurky > Akční a herní postavičky: Akční figurky; Figurky zvířat
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Păpuși, seturi de joacă și figurine de jucărie > Figurine și jucării: Figurine; Animale de jucărie
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Poppen, speelsets en speelgoedfiguurtjes > Actie- en speelgoedfiguurtjes: Actiefiguren; Dierenfiguurtjes
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Babák, játékkészletek és játékfigurák > Akció- és játékfigurák: Akciófigurák; Állatfigurák
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 玩偶与玩具套装 > 活动玩偶/玩具玩偶: 可动人偶; 动物形象
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 인형/인형놀이 세트/장난감 피겨 > 액션/장난감 피겨: 액션 피규어; 동물 피겨
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Куклы, фигурки и игровые наборы > Игрушечные фигурки: Фигурки персонажей; Фигурки животных
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Bonecas, conjuntos e personagens > Bonecos de personagem: Bonecos de ação; Figuras de animais
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Muñecas, parques infantiles y figuras de juguete > Figuras de acción y de juguete: Figuras de acción; Figuras de animales
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Nuket, leikkisetit ja leluhahmot > Toiminta- ja leluhahmot: Toimintahahmot; Eläinhahmot
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Lėlės, žaidimų rinkiniai ir žaislinės figūrėlės > Veiksmo ir žaislų figūrėlės: Veiksmo figūrėlės; Gyvūnų figūrėlės
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Lutke, igralni kompleti in figurice > Akcijske figurice in figurice za igranje: Akcijske figurice; Figurice živali
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Búp bê, Bộ đồ chơi & Mô hình đồ chơi > Mô hình động và mô hình đồ chơi: Nhân vật hành động; Mô hình động vật
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Lalki, zestawy i figurki > Zabawki i figurki akcji: Figurki kolekcjonerskie; Figurki zwierząt
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Кукли, комплекти за игра и фигурки > Игрални екшън фигурки: Екшън фигурки; Фигурки на животни
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Lutke, setovi za igru i figurice > Akcijske figure i igračke: Akcijske figure; Životinjske figure
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Poupées, coffrets et figurines > Figurines jouets: Figurines; Figurines d’animaux
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Bambole, playset e giocattoli > Action figure: Action figure; Figure di animali
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > ตุ๊กตา ชุดเล่น และหุ่นจำลอง > หุ่นแอคชันและของเล่น: ฟิกเกอร์เปลี่ยนท่าทางได้; หุ่นรูปสัตว์
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Κούκλες, σετ παιχνιδιών και φιγούρες > Φιγούρες δράσης & παιχνιδιών: Φιγούρες δράσης; Φιγούρες ζώων
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Bonecas, figuras e conjuntos de brincar > Brinquedos e figuras de ação: Figuras de ação; Figuras de animais
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Bábiky, súpravy a figúrky na hranie > Akčné figúrky na hranie: Akčné figúrky; Zvieracie figúrky
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Dukker, lekesett og lekefigurer > Action- og lekefigurer: Actionfigurer; Dyrefigurer
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 玩偶、套裝玩具組和公仔 > 公仔: 動作玩偶; 動物玩偶
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Bebekler, Oyun Setleri ve Oyuncak Figürler > Aksiyon ve Oyuncak Figürleri: Aksiyon figürleri; Hayvan Figürleri
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Dukker, legestativer og legetøjsfigurer > Action- og legetøjsfigurer: Actionfigurer; Dyrefigurer
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Dockor, lekset och leksaksfigurer > Action- och leksaksfigurer: Actionfigurer; Djurfigurer
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Puppen, Spielkombinationen & Spielzeugfiguren > Action- & Spielzeugfiguren: Actionfiguren; Tierfiguren
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > 人形・プレイセット > アクションフィギュア・トイフィギュア: アクションフィギュア; 動物フィギュア